lt-LT: Baseino chemijos tipas: Algicidas; Bromo dezinfekavimo priemonė; Kalcio kietumo didinimo priemonė; Chloro dezinfekavimo priemonė; Skaidriklis; Cianuro rūgšties stabilizatorius; Fermentų valiklis; Flokuliantas; Metalų sekvestrantas; Druska; Šoko testavimo variantai; Dėmių ir mastelio kontrolė; Žiemos paruošimo cheminė medžiaga; pH mažintojas; pH didintojas; Kita
de: Poolchemikalientyp: Algizid; Brom-Desinfektionsmittel; Kalziumhärte-Erhöher; Chlor-Desinfektionsmittel; Klärmittel; Cyanursäure-Stabilisator; Enzymreiniger; Flockungsmittel; Metallbinder; Salz; Schockverfahren; Flecken- und Schuppenkontrolle; Überwinterungsmittel; pH-Senker; pH-Erhöher; Sonstiges
en: Pool chemical type: Algaecide; Bromine sanitizer; Calcium hardness increaser; Chlorine sanitizer; Clarifier; Cyanuric acid stabilizer; Enzyme cleaner; Flocculant; Metal sequestrant; Salt; Shock treatment; Stain and scale control; Winterizing chemical; pH decreaser; pH increaser; Other
bg-BG: Вид химикал за басейн: Алгицид; Бромен дезинфектант; Повишаване на калциевата твърдост; Дезинфектант с хлор; Пречиствател; Стабилизатор на цианурова киселина; Ензимен почистващ препарат; Флокулант; Метален хелатор; Сол; Шоково третиране; Контрол на петна и варовикови отлагания; Химикал за зимна подготовка; За намаляване на pH; За повишаване на pH; Друго
pt-PT: Tipo de produto químico para piscina: Algicida; Desinfetante à base de bromo; Aumentador de dureza de cálcio; Desinfetante à base de cloro; Clarificador; Estabilizador de ácido cianúrico; Limpador enzimático; Floculante; Sequestrante de metais; Sal; Tratamento de choque; Controlo de manchas e incrustações; Produto químico para o inverno; Redutor de pH; Aumentador de pH; Outro
nb: Kjemikalietype for basseng: Algedrepende middel; Bromdesinfeksjonsmiddel; Kalsiumhardhetsøker; Klorrensemiddel; Klargjøringsmiddel; Cyanursyrestabilisator; Enzymrenser; Flokkuleringsmiddel; Metallsekvestrant; Salt; Støthåndtering; Flekk- og skalkontroll; Vinterklargjøringskjemikalie; pH-senkende middel; pH-øker; Annet
sk-SK: Typ bazénovej chemikálie: Algicíd; Brómový dezinfekčný prostriedok; Zvyšovač vápnikovej tvrdosti vody; Chlórový dezinfekčný prostriedok; Čerič; Stabilizátor kyseliny kyanurovej; Enzýmový čistič; Flokulant; Sekvestrant kovov; Soľ; Šoková dezinfekcia; Kontrola škvŕn a vodného kameňa; Chemikália na zazimovanie; Znižovač pH; Zvyšovač pH; Iné
ro-RO: Tipul de substanțe chimice pentru piscină: Algicid; Dezinfectant cu brom; Substanță de creștere a durității calciului; Dezinfectant cu clor; Clarificator; Stabilizator cu acid cianuric; Curățător enzimatic; Floculant; Agent de sechestrare a metalelor; Sare; Tratament șoc; Controlul petelor și al depunerilor; Produs pentru iernare; Agent de reducere a pH-ului; Agent de creștere a pH-ului; Altele
es: Tipo de producto químico para piscina: Alguicida; Desinfectante de bromo; Incrementador de la dureza del calcio; Desinfectante de cloro; Clarificador; Estabilizador de ácido cianúrico; Limpiador enzimático; Floculante; Secuestrante de metales; Sal; Tratamiento de choque; Control de manchas y incrustaciones; Producto químico de invernaje; Reductor de pH; Aumentador de pH; Otros
hr-HR: Vrsta kemikalije za bazen: Algicid; Dezinfekcijsko sredstvo s bromom; Pojačivač tvrdoće kalcija; Sredstvo za dezinfekciju na bazi klora; Pročišćivač; Stabilizator cijanurne kiseline; Enzimsko sredstvo za čišćenje; Flokulant; Sekvestrant metala; Sol; Šok tretman; Kontrola mrlja i kamenca; Kemikalija za zaštitu tijekom zime; Sredstvo za smanjenje pH vrijednosti; Podizač pH vrijednosti; Ostalo
da: Poolkemikalietype: Algedræbende middel; Brom-desinfektionsmiddel; Forøger af calciumhårdhed; Klorrensningsmiddel; Klargøringsmiddel; Cyanursyrestabilisator; Enzymrenser; Flokkuleringsmiddel; Metalsekvestrant; Salt; Stødhåndtering; Plet- og skalakontrol; Vinterklargøringskemikalie; pH-sænkende; pH-forøgende; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de produto químico para piscina: Algicida; Desinfetante à base de bromo; Aditivo para aumento da dureza do cálcio; Desinfetante à base de cloro; Agente clarificante; Estabilizador de ácido cianúrico; Limpador à base de enzimas; Floculante; Agente sequestrante de metais; Sal; Tratamento de choque; Controle de manchas e incrustações; Produto químico para preparo de inverno; Redutor de pH; Elevador de pH; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta kemikalije za bazen: Algicid; Bromovo razkužilo; Povečevalec trdote kalcija; Razkužilo s klorom; Čistilo; Stabilizator cianurne kisline; Encimsko čistilo; Flokulant; Vezilnik kovin; Sol; Zdravljenje s šokom; Nadzor madežev in vodnega kamna; Kemikalija za zimsko pripravo; zniževalec pH; zvišavalec pH; Drug
zh-CN: 泳池化学品类型: 除藻剂; 溴消毒剂; 钙硬度增强剂; 氯消毒剂; 澄清器; 氰尿酸稳定剂; 酶清洁剂; 絮凝剂; 金属螯合剂; 盐; 冲击性处理剂; 防污防垢剂; 冬季防冻剂; pH 降低剂; pH 值增高剂; 其他
ru: Тип химического средства для бассейна: Альгицид; Дезинфицирующее средство с бромом; Средство для повышения кальциевой жесткости; Дезинфицирующее средство с хлором; Осветлитель; Стабилизатор на основе циануровой кислоты; Ферментный очиститель; Флокулянт; Секвестрант металлов; Соль; Шоковая обработка; Средство от пятен и отложений; Средство для зимней консервации; Средство для понижения pH; Средство для повышения pH; Другое
sv: Kemikalietyp i poolen: Algdödande medel; Bromdesinfektionsmedel; Kalciumhårdhetsökningsmedel; Klordesinfektionsmedel; Renare; Cyanursyrastabilisator; Enzymrengöringsmedel; Flockuleringsmedel; Metallsekvestrant; Salt; Stöthantering; Fläck- och skalkontroll; Vinterförvaringskemikalie; pH-sänkare; pH-höjare; Övrigt
ko: 수영장 화학 제품 유형: 조류 제거제; 브롬 살균제; 칼슘 경도 조절제; 염소 소독제; 정화제; 시아누르산 안정제; 효소 세척제; 침강제; 금속 이온 봉쇄제; 소금; 쇼크 처리제; 얼룩 및 스케일 제어제; 동절기 관리제; pH 감소제; pH 증가제; 기타
el: Τύπος χημικού πισίνας: Φυκοκτονία; Απολυμαντικό βρωμίου; Αυξητής σκληρότητας ασβεστίου; Απολυμαντικό χλωρίου; Διευκρινίζων; Σταθεροποιητής κυανουρικού οξέος; Καθαριστικό ενζύμων; Κροκιδωτικό; Μεταλλικό απομονωτικό; Αλάτι; Σοκ σενάριο δοκιμής; Έλεγχος λεκέδων και κλίμακας; Χειμερινό χημικό; Μειωτής pH; Αυξητής pH; Άλλο
ja: プール薬品の種類: 殺藻剤; 臭素消毒剤; カルシウム硬度増加剤; 塩素消毒剤; 清澄剤; シアヌル酸安定剤; 酵素クリーナー; 凝集剤; 金属イオン封鎖剤; 塩; ショック処理; 汚れ・スケール抑制; 冬季用化学薬品; pH低下剤; pH上昇剤; その他
fr: Type de traitement chimique pour piscine: Algicide; Désinfectant au brome; Augmentateur de dureté calcique; Désinfectant au chlore; Clarifiant; Stabilisant à l’acide cyanurique; Nettoyant enzymatique; Floculant; Séquestrant de métaux; Sel; Traitement choc; Anti-taches et anti-calcaire; Produit d’hivernage; Réducteur de pH; Augmentateur de pH; Autre
cs: Typ bazénové chemie: Algicid; Bromový dezinfekční prostředek; Přípravek na zvýšení vápníkové tvrdosti; Na bázi chloru; Projasňovač; Stabilizátor kyseliny kyanurové; Enzymatický čistič; Flokulant; Sekvestrant; Sůl; Šokové ošetření; Přípravek proti usazeninám a skvrnám; Zazimovač; Na snížení pH; Zvyšovač pH; Jiné
nl: Type zwembadchemicaliën: Algenbestrijder; Broomdesinfectiemiddel; Calciumhardheidsverhoger; Chloor-desinfectiemiddel; Clarifier; Cyanuurzuurstabilisator; Enzymreiniger; Vlokmiddel; Metaalverwijderaar; Zout; Shockbehandeling; Vlek- en kalkbeheersing; Overwinteringsvloeistof; pH-verlager; pH-verhoger; Overig
fi: Allaskemikaalin tyyppi: Levänestoaine; Bromidesinfiointiaine; Kalsiumin kovuuden lisääjä; Klooridesinfiointiaine; Selkeytin; Syanurihappostabilisaattori; Entsyymipuhdistusaine; Flokkulantti; Metallinsidonta-aine; Suola; Shokkikäsittely; Tahrojen ja kalkin torjunta; Talvisuoja-aine; pH-arvoa alentava aine; pH-arvoa nostava aine; Muu
tr: Havuz kimyasalı türü: Alg giderici; Brom bazlı dezenfektan; Kalsiyum sertliği artırıcı; Klor bazlı dezenfektan; Berraklaştırıcı; Siyanürik asit dengeleyici; Enzim bazlı temizleyici; Çöktürücü; Metal tutucu; Tuz; Şok klorlama; Leke ve kireç kontrolü; Kışlık koruyucu kimyasal; pH düşürücü; pH yükseltici; Diğer
vi: Loại hóa chất hồ bơi: Thuốc diệt tảo; Chất khử trùng Bromine; Chất tăng độ cứng canxi; Chất khử trùng clo; Chất làm trong nước; Chất ổn định axit cyanuric; Chất tẩy rửa enzyme; Chất trợ lắng; Chất cô lập kim loại; Muối; Xử lý sốc; Kiểm soát vết bẩn và cặn vôi; Hóa chất bảo quản hồ bơi qua mùa đông; Chất giảm pH; Chất tăng pH; Khác
it: Tipo di prodotto chimico per piscina: Algicida; disinfettante al bromo; Aumentatore di durezza del calcio; disinfettante al cloro; Chiarificatore; Stabilizzante dell'acido cianurico; detergente enzimatico; Flocculante; Sequestrante di metalli; Sale; variante shock; Controllo delle macchie e delle squame; Prodotto chimico per la svernamento; abbassatore di pH; aumentatore di pH; Altro
zh-TW: 泳池化學品類型: 除藻劑; 含溴消毒劑; 鈣硬度增加劑; 氯消毒劑; 澄清劑; 氰尿酸穩定劑; 酵素清潔劑; 絮凝劑; 金屬螯合物; 鹽類; Shock 消毒處理; 污漬和積垢控制; 冬季防凍劑; pH 值降低劑; pH 值升高劑; 其他
th: ประเภทสารเคมีสำหรับสระว่ายน้ำ: สารกำจัดตะไคร่น้ำ; สารฆ่าเชื้อโบรมีน; สารเพิ่มความแข็งแรงของแคลเซียม; สารฆ่าเชื้อคลอรีน; สารขจัดตะกอนในน้ำ; สารป้องกันคลอรีนเสื่อมสภาพ; สารทำความสะอาดเอนไซม์; สารตกตะกอน; สารดักจับโลหะ; เกลือ; ปรับสภาพน้ำแบบช็อก; ป้องกันคราบและตะกรัน; สารเตรียมสระฤดูหนาว; สารลดค่า pH; สารเพิ่มค่า pH; อื่นๆ
hu: Medence kémiai típusa: Algaölő; Brómos fertőtlenítőszer; Kalciumos keménységnövelő; Klóros fertőtlenítő; Tisztító; Cianursav-stabilizátor; Enzimes tisztítószer; Ülepítőszer; Fém-megkötőanyag; Só; Sokk-kezelés; Folt és vízkő elleni védekezés; Téliesítő vegyszer; pH-csökkentő; pH-növelő; Egyéb
pl: Rodzaj chemikaliów basenowych: Algicyd; Środek dezynfekujący na bazie bromu; Zwiększacz twardości wapniowej; Środek dezynfekujący na bazie chloru; Klarownik; Stabilizator kwasu cyjanurowego; Preparat enzymatyczny; Flokulant; Środek wiążący metale; Sól; Preparat szokowy; Środek przeciw osadom i kamieniowi; Preparat do zimowania; Obniżacz pH; Podwyższacz pH; Inne